Utah statutes.
10-9a-513.   Municipality's acquisition of billboard by eminent domain --
Removal without providing compensation -- Limit on allowing nonconforming
billboards to be rebuilt or replaced -- Validity of municipal permit after
issuance of state permit.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Clearly visible" means capable of being read without obstruction by an
occupant of a vehicle traveling on a street or highway within the visibility
area.
(b)  "Highest allowable height" means:
(i)  if the height allowed by the municipality, by ordinance or consent, is
higher than the height under Subsection (1)(b)(ii), the height allowed by the
municipality; or
(ii) (A)  for a noninterstate billboard:
(I)  if the height of the previous use or structure is 45 feet or higher, the
height of the previous use or structure; or
(II)  if the height of the previous use or structure is less than 45 feet, the
height of the previous use or structure or the height to make the entire
advertising content of the billboard clearly visible, whichever is higher, but
no higher than 45 feet; and
(B)  for an interstate billboard:
(I)  if the height of the previous use or structure is at or above the
interstate height, the height of the previous use or structure; or
(II)  if the height of the previous use or structure is less than the
interstate height, the height of the previous use or structure or the height
to make the entire advertising content of the billboard clearly visible,
whichever is higher, but no higher than the interstate height.
(c)  "Interstate billboard" means a billboard that is intended to be viewed
from a highway that is an interstate.
(d)  "Interstate height" means a height that is the higher of:
(i)  65 feet above the ground; and
(ii)  25 feet above the grade of the interstate.
(e)  "Noninterstate billboard" means a billboard that is intended to be viewed
from a street or highway that is not an interstate.
(f)  "Visibility area" means the area on a street or highway that is:
(i)  defined at one end by a line extending from the base of the billboard
across all lanes of traffic of the street or highway in a plane that is
perpendicular to the street or highway; and
(ii)  defined on the other end by a line extending across all lanes of traffic
of the street or highway in a plane that is:
(A)  perpendicular to the street or highway; and
(B) (I)  for an interstate billboard, 500 feet from the base of the billboard;
or
(II)  for a noninterstate billboard, 300 feet from the base of the billboard.
(2) (a)  A municipality is considered to have initiated the acquisition of a
billboard structure by eminent domain if the municipality prevents a billboard
owner from:
(i)  rebuilding, maintaining, repairing, or restoring a billboard structure
that is damaged by casualty, an act of God, or vandalism;
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(c), relocating or rebuilding a
billboard structure, or taking other measures, to correct a mistake in the
placement or erection of a billboard for which the municipality has issued a
permit, if the proposed relocation, rebuilding, or other measure is consistent
with the intent of that permit;
(iii)  structurally modifying or upgrading a billboard;
(iv)  relocating a billboard into any commercial, industrial, or manufacturing
zone within the municipality's boundaries, if:
(A)  the relocated billboard is:
(I)  within 5,280 feet of its previous location; and
(II)  no closer than:
(Aa)  300 feet from an off-premise sign existing on the same side of the
street or highway; or
(Bb)  if the street or highway is an interstate or limited access highway that
is subject to Title 72, Chapter 7, Part 5, Utah Outdoor Advertising Act, the
distance allowed under that act between the relocated billboard and an off-
premise sign existing on the same side of the interstate or limited access
highway; and
(B) (I)  the billboard owner has submitted a written request under Subsection
10-9a-511(3)(c); and
(II)  the municipality and billboard owner are unable to agree, within the
time provided in Subsection 10-9a-511(3)(c), to a mutually acceptable
location; or
(v)  making the following modifications, as the billboard owner determines, to
a billboard that is structurally modified or upgraded under Subsection
(2)(a)(iii) or relocated under Subsection (2)(a)(iv):
(A)  erecting the billboard:
(I)  to the highest allowable height; and
(II)  as the owner determines, to an angle that makes the entire advertising
content of the billboard clearly visible; and
(B)  installing a sign face on the billboard that is at least the same size
as, but no larger than, the sign face on the billboard before its relocation.
(b)  A modification under Subsection (2)(a)(v) shall comply with Title 72,
Chapter 7, Part 5, Utah Outdoor Advertising Act, to the extent applicable.
(c)  A municipality's denial of a billboard owner's request to relocate or
rebuild a billboard structure, or to take other measures, in order to correct
a mistake in the placement or erection of a billboard does not constitute the
initiation of acquisition by eminent domain under Subsection (2)(a) if the
mistake in placement or erection of the billboard is determined by clear and
convincing evidence to have resulted from an intentionally false or misleading
statement:
(i)  by the billboard applicant in the application; and
(ii)  regarding the placement or erection of the billboard.
(d)  If a municipality is considered to have initiated the acquisition of a
billboard structure by eminent domain under Subsection (2)(a) or any other
provision of applicable law, the municipality shall pay just compensation to
the billboard owner in an amount that is:
(i)  the value of the existing billboard at a fair market capitalization rate,
based on actual annual revenue, less any annual rent expense;
(ii)  the value of any other right associated with the billboard structure
that is acquired;
(iii)  the cost of the sign structure; and
(iv)  damage to the economic unit described in Subsection 72-7-510(3)(b), of
which the billboard owner's interest is a part.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2) and Section 10-9a-512, a municipality may
remove a billboard without providing compensation if:
(a)  the municipality determines:
(i)  by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant for a permit
intentionally made a false or misleading statement in the applicant's
application regarding the placement or erection of the billboard; or
(ii)  by substantial evidence that the billboard:
(A)  is structurally unsafe;
(B)  is in an unreasonable state of repair; or
(C)  has been abandoned for at least 12 months;
(b)  the municipality notifies the owner in writing that the owner's billboard
meets one or more of the conditions listed in Subsections (3)(a)(i) and (ii);
(c)  the owner fails to remedy the condition or conditions within:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(c)(ii), 90 days following the
billboard owner's receipt of written notice under Subsection (3)(b); or
(ii)  if the condition forming the basis of the municipality's intention to
remove the billboard is that it is structurally unsafe, 10 business days, or a
longer period if necessary because of a natural disaster, following the
billboard owner's receipt of written notice under Subsection (3)(b); and
(d)  following the expiration of the applicable period under Subsection (3)(c)
and after providing the owner with reasonable notice of proceedings and an
opportunity for a hearing, the municipality finds:
(i)  by clear and convincing evidence, that the applicant for a permit
intentionally made a false or misleading statement in the application
regarding the placement or erection of the billboard; or
(ii)  by substantial evidence that the billboard is structurally unsafe, is in
an unreasonable state of repair, or has been abandoned for at least 12 months.
(4)  A municipality may not allow a nonconforming billboard to be rebuilt or
replaced by anyone other than its owner or the owner acting through its
contractors.
(5)  A permit issued, extended, or renewed by a municipality for a billboard
remains valid from the time the municipality issues, extends, or renews the
permit until 180 days after a required state permit is issued for the
billboard if:
(a)  the billboard requires a state permit; and
(b)  an application for the state permit is filed within 30 days after the
municipality issues, extends, or renews a permit for the billboard.
